Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 1 COUNTY BOUNDARIES AND COUNTY SEATS
§ 31-141. Power county.

Power county is described as follows: beginning at the northwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range thirty (30) east; thence east along the section line between sections thirty-one (31) and thirty (30), township and range aforesaid, and an extension thereof to the point where such extended line intersects with the center of the west channel of Snake river; running thence up the center of the west channel of Snake river, upon and along the boundary line of Bingham county, to the point in the main channel of said river, where the same divides, forming the east and west branches thereof; thence southerly down the center of the east branch of Snake river to the point of intersection of the center line of said east branch with an extension of the center line of the Portneuf river in section seventeen (17), township six (6) south, range thirty-two (32) east; thence up the Portneuf river, to the intersection of the Portneuf river with the west boundary line of section eight (8), township six (6) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence south four and one-quarter (4 ¼) miles to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence west to the northeast corner of section six (6), township seven (7) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence south four (4) miles to the southeast corner of section nineteen (19); thence east one (1) mile to the northeast corner of section twenty-nine (29); thence south four (4) miles to the southeast corner of section eight (8), township eight (8) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence east two (2) miles to the northeast corner of section fifteen (15); thence south two and one-half (2 ½) miles to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty-seven (27); thence east one (1) mile to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty-six (26); thence south one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the southeast corner of section thirty-five (35), township eight (8) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence east one (1) mile to the northeast corner of section one (1), township nine (9) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence south two (2) miles to the southeast corner of section twelve (12); thence east two (2) miles to the northeast corner of section seventeen (17), township nine (9) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty (20); thence west one-half (½) mile to the center of section twenty (20); thence south two and one-half (2 ½) miles to the south quarter (S¼) corner of section thirty-two (32), township nine (9) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence east to the northeast corner of section five (5), township ten (10) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south one and one-quarter (1 ¼) miles to the southeast corner of the northeast quarter (NE¼) of the northeast quarter (NE¼) of section eight (8); thence west one-quarter (¼) mile; thence south one-quarter (¼) mile; thence west one and one-quarter (1 ¼) miles; thence south three-quarters (¾) of a mile; thence west one-quarter (¼) mile to the southwest corner of lot one (1) of section eighteen (18), township ten (10) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south on the range line three and three-quarter (3 ¾) miles to the southwest corner of township ten (10) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence west along and upon the south line of said township ten (10) (1913, ch. 6, section 2, pp. 31, 32), to a point a distance of two (2) miles east from the southeast corner of township ten (10) south, range thirty-three (33) east; thence south to a point where the line thus drawn intersects the line between townships eleven (11) and twelve (12) south, range thirty-four (34) east; thence west along and upon the line between townships eleven (11) and twelve (12) south (1915, ch. 132, section 2, p. 288), to the southeast corner of township eleven (11) south, range thirty-two (32) east; thence south upon the township line to the southeast corner of township twelve (12) south, range thirty-two (32) east; thence west upon and along the southern line of said township twelve (12), to the southwest corner of township twelve (12) south, range thirty (30) east; thence north upon the range line between ranges twenty-nine (29) and thirty (30) east, to the southwest corner of township nine (9) south, range thirty (30) east; thence west along and upon the south line of township nine (9) south, to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence north upon and along the line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east, and an extension thereof to the point where said line so extended intersects the center of the main channel of Snake river; thence down the center of the main channel of Snake river to the point of intersection with the range line between ranges twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28) east; thence north along and upon said range line to the northwest corner of township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence east upon and along the north line of said township nine (9) south, to the northeast corner of section four (4), township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence in a northerly direction along and upon the section line which, when surveyed, will be between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township eight (8) south, range twenty-eight (28) east, and an extension of such line to the point where such extended line will intersect with the township line which, when surveyed, will be the township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence west upon the township line to a point which when surveyed, will be the southwest corner of township seven (7) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence north along and upon the range line which, when surveyed, will be the range line between ranges twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28) east, to a point which will be, when surveyed and established, the northwest corner of township four (4) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence east along and upon the line which will be, when surveyed, the north line of said township four (4) south, to the northwest corner of township four (4) south, range thirty (30) east; thence south along the range line, the same being the western boundary line of Bingham county, to the northwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range thirty (30) east, the point of beginning (1913, ch. 6, section 2, pp. 32, 33).

§ 31-142. Shoshone county.

Shoshone county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the township line between townships forty-one (41) and forty-two (42) north, intersects the western boundary of the state of Montana;

Eastern boundary. Thence in a northerly direction along the said boundary and with the Bitter Root range of mountains until the said range turns in a westerly direction and is called Coeur d’Alene.

Northern boundary. Thence with the said Coeur d’Alene range of mountains in a westerly direction until a point is attained north of the mouth of the North Fork of the Clearwater river;

Western boundary. Thence south to the township line between townships forty-one (41) and forty-two (42) north;

Southern boundary. Thence east on the said township line to the intersection of the same with the boundary line of the state of Montana, the place of beginning.

County seat — Wallace.

§ 31-143. Teton county.

Teton county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the northern boundary line of Bonneville county, the said point being two (2) miles east of the range line, which, when surveyed, will be between ranges forty-two (42) and forty-three (43) east;

Southern boundary. Thence easterly and southerly on the northern boundary line of Bonneville county as now established, to a point where said boundary line intersects the boundary line dividing the states of Idaho and Wyoming;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along the boundary line between the states of Idaho and Wyoming, to a point where said dividing line intersects Bitch creek;

Northern boundary. Thence westerly and down the center of said Bitch creek, to a point where said Bitch creek intersects and runs into the main channel of the Teton river, and to the center of said main channel; thence down the said main channel of the said Teton river, to a point where the same intersects the section line between sections sixteen (16) and seventeen (17), township seven (7) north, range forty-three (43) east;

Western boundary. Thence south along said line to the place of beginning.

County seat — Driggs.

§ 31-144. Twin Falls county.

Twin Falls county is described as follows: beginning with the intersection of the middle of the channel of the Snake river with the north and south center line of section twenty-eight (28), township ten (10) south, range twenty-one (21) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence south on said center line of section twenty-eight (28), to the point of intersection of the north line of the right of way of the Minidoka & Southwestern Railroad Company, which point is one hundred (100) feet distant, at right angles, from the center of the main track of the line of road of said railroad company as the same is now located; thence in a southwesterly direction along the north line of said railroad right of way, to a point where said line intersects the south line of the canal right of way of the Twin Falls Land & Water Company, which point of intersection is one hundred (100) feet distant, at right angles, from the center line of the main canal of said Twin Falls Land & Water company; thence south to the south line of section thirty-six (36), township ten (10) south, range twenty (20) east; thence west to the southwest corner of section thirty-six (36); thence south on the section line to the south line of township eleven (11); thence west to the southeast corner of township eleven (11) south, range eighteen (18) east; thence south on the range line to the south line of the state of Idaho;

Southern boundary. Thence west along the south line of the state of Idaho to the thirty-eighth (38th) meridian of longitude west from Washington;

Western boundary. Thence north along said meridian to the intersection of the center of the main channel of Snake river;

Northern boundary. Thence up the center of the main channel of Snake river to the point of beginning.

County seat — Twin Falls.

§ 31-145. Valley county.

Valley county is described as follows: beginning at the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township ten (10) north, range two (2) east, on the second (2d) standard parallel north;

Southern boundary. Thence east along the said second (2d) standard parallel, five (5) miles to the center of the North Fork of Payette river; thence northerly along the river to the intersection with the line between townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north; thence east to the ridge dividing the waters of the Salmon and Payette rivers; thence northeasterly along the said ridge and along the ridge dividing Bear Valley creek and Cape Horn creek, to the head of the Middle Fork of the Salmon river;

Eastern boundary. Thence northerly along the said river to the intersection of the fifth (5th) standard parallel north;

Northern boundary. Thence west to the divide separating the waters of the Salmon and Payette rivers;

Western boundary. Thence westerly and southerly along the said divide and the divide between Payette and Weiser rivers, to the line between townships thirteen (13) and fourteen (14) north; thence east to the southwest corner of township fourteen (14) north, range three (3) east; thence south twelve (12) miles to the southwest corner of township twelve (12) north, range three (3) east; thence west three (3) miles to the northwest corner of section three (3), township eleven (11) north, range two (2) east; thence south twelve (12) miles, to the place of beginning.

County seat — Cascade.

§ 31-146. Washington county.

Washington county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the boundary line between the states of Idaho and Oregon, the same being the middle of the center channel of Snake river, three thousand nine hundred sixty (3,960) feet in a southwesterly direction from the mouth of Wildhorse river;

Northern boundary. Thence in an easterly direction fifteen and one-half (15 ½) miles, to a point one-half (½) mile east of the west quarter (W¼) corner of section six (6), township seventeen (17) north, range two (2) west; thence south about twelve (12) miles, to the intersection of said line with Cow creek; thence southeast down the center line of Cow creek to its confluence with the Weiser river; thence south across the Weiser river to a point five hundred (500) feet east of the north quarter (N¼) corner of section twenty-nine (29), township fifteen (15) north, range two (2) west; thence east about three and three-quarters (3 ¾) miles, to a point one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet east of the northwest corner of section twenty-five (25), said township and range; thence south eight and one-half (8 ½) miles, to a point one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet east of the west quarter (W¼) corner of section one (1), township thirteen (13) north, range two (2) west; thence in a southeasterly direction six and one-half (6 ½) miles, to a point one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet south and one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet east of the west quarter (W¼) corner of section twenty-four (24), township thirteen (13) north, range one (1) west; thence east (1911, ch. 31, section 2, p. 67) to the summit of the dividing range between the waters of Crane creek on the west and Squaw creek on the east;

Eastern boundary. Thence southerly along the summit of said dividing range to the intersection of said dividing ridge with the second (2d) standard parallel north (R.C., section 23f);

Southern boundary. Thence west along said second (2d) standard parallel to its intersection with the Snake river;

Western boundary. Thence down the main channel of Snake river, to the place of beginning (R.C., section 23w).

County seat — Weiser.